Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2702
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act:

(1) Acting in concert means persons knowingly acting together with a common goal of jointly acquiring control of a licensee whether or not pursuant to an express agreement;

(2) Applicant means a person filing an application for a license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act;

(3) Authorized delegate means a person designated by the licensee to engage in money transmission on behalf of the licensee;

(4) Average daily money transmission liability means the amount of the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations in this state at the end of each day in a given period of time, added together, and divided by the total number of days in the given period of time. For purposes of calculating average daily money transmission liability under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act for any licensee required to do so, the given period of time shall be each calendar quarter;

(5) Closed loop stored value means stored value that is redeemable by the issuer of such stored value only for goods or services provided by the issuer or affiliates of such issuer or franchisees of the issuer or affiliates of such franchisees, except to the extent the stored value is required by applicable law to be redeemable in cash for the cash value of the stored value;

(6)(a) Control means:

(i) Direct or indirect power over the vote of at least twenty-five percent of the outstanding voting shares or voting interests of a licensee or person in control of a licensee;

(ii) The power to elect or appoint a majority of key individuals, executive officers, managers, directors, trustees, or other persons that have managerial authority of a person in control of a licensee; or

(iii) The power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling influence over the management or policies of a licensee or person in control of a licensee.

(b) For purposes of determining the percentage of a person controlled by any other person, the person's interest shall be aggregated with the interest of any other immediate family member, including the person's spouse, parents, children, siblings, mothers-in-law, fathers-in-law, sons-in-law, daughters-in-law, brothers-in-law, and sisters-in-law, and any other person who shares such person's residence;

(7) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;

(8) Director means the Director of Banking and Finance;

(9) Eligible rating means a credit rating of any of the three highest rating categories provided by an eligible rating service, whereby each category may include rating category modifiers such as plus or minus for Standard and Poor's Corporation or the equivalent for any other eligible rating service. Long-term credit ratings are deemed eligible if the rating is equal to A- or higher by Standard and Poor's Corporation, or the equivalent from any other eligible rating service. Short-term credit ratings are deemed eligible if the rating is equal to or higher than A-2 or SP-2 by Standard and Poor's Corporation or the equivalent from any other eligible rating service. In the event that ratings differ among eligible rating services, the highest rating shall apply when determining whether a security bears an eligible rating.

(10) Eligible rating service means any nationally recognized statistical rating organization approved by the Securities and Exchange Commission and any other organization designated by the director by rule or order;

(11) Federally insured depository financial institution means a bank, credit union, savings and loan association, trust company, savings association, savings bank, industrial bank, or industrial loan company organized under the laws of the United States or any state of the United States, when such bank, credit union, savings and loan association, trust company, savings association, savings bank, industrial bank, or industrial loan company has federally insured deposits;

(12) Foreign adversary person means:

(a) A foreign person that is domiciled in, is headquartered in, has its principal place of business in, or is organized under the laws of any country listed in 15 C.F.R. 791.4;

(b) An entity with respect to which a foreign person or combination of foreign persons described in subdivision (12)(a) of this section directly or indirectly own at least a twenty-five percent share; or

(c) A person subject to the direction or control of a foreign person or entity described in subdivision (12)(a) or (b) of this section;

(13) In this state means at a physical location within this state for a transaction requested in person. For a transaction requested electronically or by telephone, the provider of money transmission may determine if the person requesting the transaction is in this state by relying on other information provided by such person regarding the location of the individual's residential address or the entity's principal place of business or other physical address location and any records associated with such person that the provider of money transmission may have that indicate the location of the individual's residential address or the entity's principal place of business or other physical address location, including, but not limited to, an address associated with an account;

(14) Individual means a natural person;

(15)(a) Informal value transfer system services means services provided by any system, mechanism, or network of persons or entities that:

(i) Receives money for the purpose of making the funds or an equivalent value payable to a third party in another geographic location, whether or not in the same form; or

(ii) Facilitates the transfer of money domestically or internationally outside the conventional money-transmission system.

(b) Informal value transfer system services includes hawala systems or agencies or similar systems or agencies for transferring money by payment to an agent who instructs a remote associate to pay a final recipient.

(c) Informal value transfer system services does not include armored car services or issuance of gift cards;

(16) Key individual means any individual ultimately responsible for establishing or directing policies and procedures of the licensee, such as an executive officer, manager, director, or trustee;

(17) Licensee means a person licensed under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act;

(18) Material litigation means litigation, that according to United States generally accepted accounting principles, is significant to a person's financial health and would be required to be disclosed in the person's annual audited financial statements, report to shareholders, or similar records;

(19) Model Money Transmission Modernization Act means the Model Money Transmission Modernization Act approved for state adoption by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors Board of Directors that sets nationwide standards, including net worth, surety bond, and permissible investments requirements, to modernize the supervision and regulation of money transmitters;

(20) Monetary value means a medium of exchange, whether or not redeemable in money;

(21) Money means a medium of exchange that is authorized or adopted by the United States or a foreign government. Money includes a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between two or more governments;

(22)(a) Money transmission means any of the following:

(i) Selling or issuing payment instruments to a person located in this state;

(ii) Selling or issuing stored value to a person located in this state; and

(iii) Receiving money for transmission from a person located in this state.

(b) Money transmission includes payroll processing services and informal value transfer system services. Money transmission does not include the provision solely of online or telecommunications services or network access;

(23) Multistate licensing process means any agreement entered into by and among state regulators relating to coordinated processing of applications for money transmission licenses, applications for the acquisition of control of a licensee, control determinations, or notice and information requirements for a change of key individuals;

(24) Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry means the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, also known as the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, developed by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators and owned and operated by the State Regulatory Registry LLC, or any successor or affiliated entity, for the licensing and registration of persons in financial services industries;

(25)(a) Outstanding money transmission obligation means:

(i) Any payment instrument or stored value issued or sold by the licensee to a person located in the United States or reported as sold by an authorized delegate of the licensee to a person that is located in the United States that has not yet been paid or refunded by or for the licensee or has been escheated in accordance with applicable abandoned property laws; or

(ii) Any money received for transmission by the licensee or an authorized delegate in the United States from a person located in the United States that has not been received by the payee or refunded to the sender or has been escheated in accordance with applicable abandoned property laws.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (25) of this section, in the United States includes, to the extent applicable, a person in any state, territory, or possession of the United States; the District of Columbia; the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico; or a United States military installation that is located in a foreign country;

(26) Payment instrument means a written or electronic check, draft, money order, traveler's check, or other written or electronic instrument for the transmission or payment of money or monetary value, whether or not negotiable. Payment instrument does not include stored value or any instrument that:

(a) Is redeemable by the issuer only for goods or services provided by the issuer or affiliates of such issuer or franchisees of the issuer or affiliates of such franchisees except to the extent the instrument is required by applicable law to be redeemable in cash for the cash value of the instrument; or

(b) Is not sold publicly but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty, rewards, or promotional program;

(27) Payroll processing services means receiving money for transmission pursuant to a contract with a person to deliver wages or salaries, make payment of payroll taxes to state and federal agencies, make payments relating to employee benefit plans, or make distributions of other authorized deductions from wages or salaries. Payroll processing services does not include an employer performing payroll processing services on the employer's own behalf or on behalf of an affiliate of the employer;

(28) Person means any individual, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, association, joint stock corporation, or other corporate entity identified by the director;

(29) Receipt means a paper receipt, electronic record, or other written confirmation;

(30) Receiving money for transmission or money received for transmission means receiving money or monetary value in the United States for transmission within or outside the United States by electronic or other means;

(31) Remit means to make direct payments of money to a licensee or a representative of a licensee authorized to receive money or to deposit money in a bank in an account specified by the licensee; and

(32) Stored value means monetary value representing a claim against the issuer of the stored value evidenced by an electronic or digital record, and that is intended and accepted for use as a means of redemption for money or monetary value, or payment for goods or services. Stored value includes, but is not limited to, prepaid access as defined by 31 C.F.R. 1010.100. Notwithstanding the foregoing, stored value does not include a payment instrument or closed loop stored value, or stored value not sold publicly but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty, rewards, or promotional program.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB838, § 2.
July 18, 2026